Washington statutes.
RCW 18.30.150

Partnerships with dentists.

Notwithstanding any other provision of state law, a licensed denturist may enter into a partnership or other business association with a dentist, provided that such association does not impede the independent professional judgment of either party.

[ 1995 c 1 s 16 (Initiative Measure No. 607, approved November 8, 1994).]